District of Columbia statutes.
47-106

Appropriations for contingent expenses — Apportionment.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall, on or before the beginning of each fiscal year, so apportion appropriations made for contingent and miscellaneous expenses under the Metropolitan Police, Fire Department, Department of Licenses, Investigation and Inspections, and other offices or departments of the government of the District of Columbia as to prevent deficiencies in said appropriations.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 561, ch. 1351
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-106.
1973 Ed., § 47-106.
Reorganization Order No. 55, dated June 30, 1953, established a Department of Licenses and Inspections and transferred to such Department all functions of the Electrical Inspection Section in the former Department of Inspections. Functions of the Department of Licenses and Inspections were transferred to the Director of the Department of Economic Development by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969, which was replaced by the Department of Licenses, Investigation and Inspections, created by Mayor’s Order 78-42, dated February 17, 1978.